Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.170

Liability of sureties.

When the penal sum of any bond amounts to more than two thousand dollars, the sureties may become severally liable for portions, not less than five hundred dollars, of such penal sum, making in the aggregate at least two sureties for the whole penal sum.

[ 1890 p 37 s 12; RRS s 9941.]

NOTES:

Recoveries limited to amount of bond: RCW 42.08.050.